District of Columbia statutes.
47-407

Repealed

Powers of Mayor — Waiver of interest and penalties.

Repealed.

June 25, 1938, 52 Stat. 1201, ch. 702, § 7
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(c), 48 DCR 334
1981 Ed., § 47-407.
1973 Ed., § 47-307.
Section 410(d) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(a), (c), (j), (m), (p), (q), (s), (w), (bb), (dd), (ee), (hh) through (kk), (mm) through (oo), (qq) through (uu), (yy), (zz), (bbb), (ddd), and (fff) shall apply for all tax years or taxable periods beginning after December 31, 2000.”